Vermont, session 2025-2026, H558.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1904 is added to read:
§ 1904. MEDICAID SCHOOL-BASED SERVICES PROGRAM
(a)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the State of Vermont
maximize its receipt of federal reimbursement for medically related services
provided to students who are eligible under Title XIX (Medicaid) of the Social
Security Act.
VT LEG #385817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.558
2026 Page 2 of 8
(2) It is also the intent of the General Assembly that Vermont’s school-
based medical assistance program shall comply with all federal Medicaid
requirements. As the State Medicaid agency, the Agency of Human Services
shall have sole responsibility for determining and maintaining program
compliance.
(b) The Agency of Education:
(1) shall be responsible for coordination of the school-based medical
assistance program with statewide education policy and objectives and for
communicating with supervisory unions; and
(2) may specify the use of program funds received by State education
agencies in accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 2959a.
(c) The Agency of Human Services shall adopt rules in accordance with
3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to identify the services that are available through the
school-based medical assistance program and to set forth the requirements for
supervisory union participation. The rules shall include State and federal
requirements for:
(1) Medicaid reimbursement;
(2) Medicaid cost reports;
(3) provider enrollment and trainings;
(4) service documentation;
(5) Medicaid eligibility; and
VT LEG #385817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.558
2026 Page 3 of 8
(6) any other provisions necessary for compliance with the Medicaid
program.
(d) The Agency of Human Services shall support supervisory unions by
funding and providing the technical elements of the program necessary for
federal compliance.
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 1904a is added to read:
§ 1904a. SCHOOL-BASED MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FUND
(a) The School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement Fund is established as a
special fund to receive federal reimbursements for medically related services
delivered pursuant to the Medicaid school-based services program described in
section 1904 of this chapter. Monies received by the State pursuant to this
section shall be transferred to the School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement
Fund, which shall be administered by the Agency of Human Services, and
Fund receipts shall be allocated in accordance with this section.
(b) The Department of Vermont Health Access shall pay 55 percent of the
federal reimbursement monies generated by the medically related services
delivered in each supervisory union pursuant to the Medicaid school-based
services program to the supervisory union based on the Medicaid cost reports,
service claims, and Medicaid administrative costs submitted by the supervisory
union.
VT LEG #385817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.558
2026 Page 4 of 8
(c)(1) Up to 25 percent of the federal reimbursement monies generated by
services delivered pursuant to the Medicaid school-based services program
shall be available for the administrative costs of the Agencies of Education and
of Human Services related to the collection, operations, and reporting of
school-based medical assistance programs and statewide programs.
(2) The Agencies shall enter into a memorandum of understanding
setting forth the processes by which Medicaid reimbursement monies available
for administrative costs and statewide programs are allocated to the Agencies.
(3) The Secretaries of Education and of Human Services shall expend
monies from the Fund only as appropriated by the General Assembly.
(d) At the close of each fiscal year, the Commissioner of Finance and
Management shall transfer to and deposit any balance remaining in the School-
Based Medicaid Reimbursement Fund into the Education Fund.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 2959a is amended to read:
§ 2959a. EDUCATION MEDICAID RECEIPTS MEDICAID SCHOOL-
BASED SERVICES PROGRAM; SUPERVISORY UNIONS AND
SUPERVISORY DISTRICTS
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the State of Vermont shall
maximize its receipt of federal Medicaid dollars available for reimbursement
of for medically related services provided to students who are Medicaid
VT LEG #385817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.558
2026 Page 5 of 8
eligible under Title XIX (Medicaid) of the Social Security Act. It is further the
intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) each supervisory union identify special education and other students
eligible for Medicaid reimbursement and, to the extent possible, submit
Medicaid bills for services reimbursement Medicaid-compliant cost reports
and service claims; and
(2) the Agencies of Education and of Human Services work with local
school districts to maximize reimbursements, including services to non-IEP
students.
(b) A Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund is established within the
Agency of Education. Funds received by the State under this section shall be
transferred to the Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund. The Fund receipts
shall be allocated in accordance with this section.
(c) At least annually, the Secretary of Education shall pay to each
supervisory union submitting Medicaid bills under this section 50 percent of
the reimbursed funds generated by the supervisory union’s bill, excluding
claims generated by State-placed students. Unless the supervisory union has
agreed to use the funds to operate a supervisory unionwide program or to
distribute the funds in a different manner, upon receipt, the supervisory union
shall distribute the funds to its member school districts based on how the funds
were generated. The Secretary may withhold payment due a supervisory union
VT LEG #385817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.558
2026 Page 6 of 8
pursuant to section 2950 of this title for a Medicaid-eligible State-placed
student if the supervisory union has not submitted a Medicaid claim for
reimbursable services for that student.
(d) If the amount of Medicaid reimbursement funds received for services
provided in the prior State fiscal year exceeds $25,000,000.00, in addition to
the 50 percent of the funds paid to supervisory unions submitting Medicaid
bills, 25 percent of the amounts in excess of the $25,000,000.00 shall be paid
into an incentive fund created in the Agency of Education. These funds shall
be used for an incentive payment to supervisory unions with student
participation rates of over 80 percent in accordance with a formula to be
developed by the Agency, in consultation with the Vermont Superintendents
Association. For any incentive payments made subsequent to fiscal year 2007,
the $25,000,000.00 threshold of this subsection shall be increased by the
percentage increase of the most recent New England Economic Project
Cumulative Price Index, as of November 15, for state and local government
purchases of goods and services from fiscal year 2005 through the fiscal year
for which the payment is being determined, plus an additional one-tenth of one
percent.
(e) Supervisory unions shall use funds received under this section from the
School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement Fund established in 33 V.S.A.
§ 1904a to pay for the reasonable costs of administering the Medicaid claims
VT LEG #385817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.558
2026 Page 7 of 8
process and delivering medically related services pursuant to the Medicaid
school-based services program, and school districts or supervisory unions shall
use funds received under this section for prevention and intervention programs
in prekindergarten through grade 12. The programs shall be designed to
facilitate early identification of and intervention with children with disabilities
and to ensure all students achieve rigorous and challenging standards approved
and adopted by the State Board or locally adopted standards. A supervisory
union shall provide annual written justification to the Secretary of Education
on how it or its member districts used the funds. Such annual submission shall
show how the funds’ use is expressly linked to those provisions of the
supervisory union’s action plan that directly relate to improving student
performance. A supervisory union shall include in its annual report the amount
of the prior year’s Medicaid reimbursement revenues and the use of Medicaid
funds consistent with the purposes set forth in this subsection.
(f) Up to 30 percent of Medicaid reimbursements received under this
section shall be available for administrative costs of the Agencies of Education
and of Human Services related to the collection, processing, and reporting of
education Medicaid reimbursements and statewide programs. The Secretaries
of Education and of Human Services shall expend monies from the Fund only
as appropriated by the General Assembly.
VT LEG #385817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.558
2026 Page 8 of 8
(g) Remaining reimbursed funds shall be deposited into the Education
Fund.
(c) The Agency of Education shall adopt rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25:
(1) Setting forth the requirements that supervisory unions and school
districts shall meet regarding the use of Medicaid reimbursements from the
School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement Fund.
(2) Coordinating reimbursement related to State-placed students
pursuant to section 2950 of this chapter with the Medicaid school-based
services program as set forth in 33 V.S.A. §§ 1904 and 1904a. The rules shall
address the manner in which supervisory unions receive and reconcile funds in
alignment with education cost reimbursements pursuant to section 2950 of this
title.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385817 v.1